Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1874.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 701 of the act of December 8, 2004 (P.L.1801, No.238), known as the Transit Revitalization Investment District Act, is amended to read:<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 Section 701. Creation of value capture area.In conjunction with the formal establishment of the TRID boundaries, a coterminous value capture area shall simultaneously be created to enable local municipalities, school districts, the county and the public transportation agency to share the increased tax increment of real estate and other designated tax revenues generated by new real estate investment within the TRID. The participants in the TRID, through the designated management entity, shall develop an administrative and project schedule and budget to implement the project, including future maintenance needs, as defined in the TRID planning study, as well as the shares and use of the incremental revenues as are projected to be generated from the TRID value capture area. The designated management entity may deposit incremental revenues in a separate tax increment fund for the benefit of a redevelopment authority and to implement the TRID planning study. After termination of the TRID, participating municipalities, school districts and the county may continue to deposit a portion of the incremental tax revenue from the value capture area into the fund for the benefit of the redevelopment authority. The participating municipality or municipalities may review and revise the TRID budget.SECTION 2. THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:SECTION 701.1. REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY USE OF INCREMENTAL TAX REVENUE IN VALUE CAPTURE AREA.(A) USE OF REVENUES GENERALLY.--IF THE DESIGNATED MANAGEMENT ENTITY DEPOSITS INCREMENTAL REVENUES IN A SEPARATE TAX INCREMENT FUND FOR THE BENEFIT OF A REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY UNDER SECTION 701, THE REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY SHALL USE THE REVENUES WITHIN THE VALUE CAPTURE AREA.20250HB1874PN2419 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) USE OF REVENUES AFTER TERMINATION OF TRID.--IF PARTICIPATING MUNICIPALITIES, SCHOOL DISTRICTS AND COUNTIES CONTINUE TO DEPOSIT A PORTION OF THE INCREMENTAL TAX REVENUE FROM THE VALUE CAPTURE AREA INTO THE SEPARATE TAX INCREMENT FUND FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY AFTER THE TERMINATION OF A TRID UNDER SECTION 701, THE REDEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY SHALL USE THE REVENUES WITHIN THE VALUE CAPTURE AREA.Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1874PN2419 - 3 - <--12345678